New York, session 2025-2026, A3374.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 19-a to read as follows: 3 § 19-a. Physician charges for missed appointments of patients; limita- 4 tion and disclosure. 1. No physician licensed under article one hundred 5 thirty-one of the education law shall charge any patient a fee or other 6 charge for failing to appear at the appointed time of a scheduled 7 appointment where the physician's office has received notice of a 8 cancellation or a change of the appointment at least twenty-four hours 9 in advance of the scheduled appointment. 10 2. In any case where a physician's policy is to charge a fee for 11 missed patient appointments, advance written notice of the terms of such 12 policy shall be prominently posted in the patient waiting room of the 13 physician's office and periodically included with bills mailed to 14 patients. No fee for missed patient appointments may be charged in the 15 absence of such advance written notice being given to the patient. A 16 patient shall be notified if the waiting time is approximately forty- 17 five minutes or more. A patient cancellation fee shall be barred if a 18 patient arrives on time for their appointment and waits longer than one 19 hour after their appointment time and was not seen by a physician. 20 3. No provision of this section shall be deemed to authorize a physi- 21 cian to charge a fee for missed patient appointments if such charge is EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07279-03-6 A. 3374--A 2 1 otherwise prohibited by law, regulation, rule or practice or deemed to 2 be unethical. 3 4. A physician who is determined, after opportunity for a hearing, to 4 have violated the provisions of this section shall be subject to a fine 5 pursuant to subdivision two of section twelve-b of this article. In 6 addition, where the provisions of this section have been violated, the 7 physician shall refund to the patient the amount collected as a fee for 8 a missed patient appointment. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of the calendar month 10 next succeeding the sixtieth day after it shall have become a law and 11 shall apply to all appointments scheduled to occur on or after its 12 effective date no matter when made.